Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 1. Applicability; Definitions.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, §§ 2, 33.

§ 24.2-100.
Applicability of title.

The provisions of this title shall apply to all elections held in this Commonwealth except as is otherwise provided by general law.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-176; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-95; 1980, c. 639; 1993, c. 641.

Cross references.

For power of General Assembly to enact laws to regulate elections, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 4.

As to public bodies and records to the Virginia Freedom of Information Act is inapplicable, see §

2.2-3703

.

Editor’s note.

At its regular session of 1991, the General Assembly directed the Code Commission to make a study of the laws governing elections in the Commonwealth. In January of 1993, the Commission sent to the Governor and General Assembly its report containing a proposed revision of Title 24.1, Elections. This report, which was published as Senate Document No. 25 of the 1993 session, contains reviser’s notes and other explanatory matter which, while valuable, are too lengthy for inclusion here. The Commission’s draft of the revision of Title 24.1, as amended by the General Assembly, became c. 641 of the Acts of 1993. Effective December 1, 1993, it repealed Title 24.1 and enacted in lieu thereof a new Title 24.2.

In addition to its revision by c. 641, former Title 24.1 was amended by certain other acts passed at the 1993 session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated these amendments into new Title 24.2.

Many of the cases cited in the notes under sections of this title were decided under corresponding provisions of former Title 24.1 and earlier statutes.

Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 2 provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions or contents of any section or chapter of Title 24.1 or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such titles existed prior to December 1, 1993, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 24.2 or any other title of the Code and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 24.2 or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 24.1 or other title
appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents or portions thereof.”

Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 3 provides: “That the rules and regulations of the State Board of Elections in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations promulgated under this act.”

Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 4 provides: “That this recodification of Title 24.1 as Title 24.2 shall not be construed to require the reappointment of any officer or any member of a board, council, committee or other appointed body referred to in Title 24.2, and each such officer and member shall continue to serve for the term for which appointed pursuant to the provisions of Title 24.1.”

Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 5 provides: “That this recodification of Title 24.1 as Title 24.2, including the repeal of § 24.1-90.2, shall not be construed to affect the term of office of any elected officeholder holding office on December 1, 1993.”

Acts 1993, c. 641, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of § 9-77.11 [now § 30-152] of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the codification of Title 24.2 so as to give effect to other laws enacted at the 1993 Session of the General Assembly notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Law Review.

For a symposium, “The Law and Economics of Elections,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1533 (1999).

For an article, “The Law and Economics of ‘Informed Voter’ Ballot Notations,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1533 (1999).

For a commentary, “Garrett’s Temptation,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1589 (1999).

For a commentary, “The Theory of Political Competition,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1605 (1999).

For an article, “Governing Through Intermediaries,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1627 (1999).

For a commentary, “Pluralism With a Corporate Face: A Comment On Issacharoff and Ortiz,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1671 (1999).

For a commentary, “Political Parties as Donative Intermediaries,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1683 (1999).

For an article, “Politics By Other Means,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1697 (1999).

For a commentary, “It’s Not Just Talk,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1725 (1999).

For a commentary, “Market Failures and Failures of Markets,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1745 (1999).

For an article, “The Issue of Issue Advocacy: An Economic, Political, and Constitutional Analysis,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1761 (1999).

For a commentary, “Taking Issue With Issue Advocacy,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1793 (1999).

For a commentary, “On the Issue of Issue Advocacy,” see 85 Va. L. Rev. 1803 (1999).

For an article, “Redistricting in the Post-2000 Era,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 431 (2000).

For an article, “Down For the Count:
The Constitutional, Political and Policy Related Problems of Census Sampling,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 477 (2000).

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 5 Parties. § 5.07 Specific Types of Parties — Various Actions. Friend.

§ 24.2-101.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Ballot scanner machine”
means the electronic counting machine in which a voter inserts a marked ballot to be scanned and the results tabulated.

“Candidate”
means a person who seeks or campaigns for an office of the Commonwealth or one of its governmental units in a general, primary, or special election and who is qualified to have his name placed on the ballot for the office. “Candidate” shall include a person who seeks the nomination of a political party or who, by reason of receiving the nomination of a political party for election to an office, is referred to as its nominee. For the purposes of Chapters 8 (§

24.2-800

et seq.), 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.), and 9.5 (§

24.2-955

et seq.), “candidate” shall include any write-in candidate. However, no write-in candidate who has received less than 15 percent of the votes cast for the office shall be eligible to initiate an election contest pursuant to Article 2 (§

24.2-803

et seq.) of Chapter 8. For the purposes of Chapters 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.) and 9.5 (§

24.2-955

et seq.), “candidate” shall include any person who raises or spends funds in order to seek or campaign for an office of the Commonwealth, excluding federal offices, or one of its governmental units in a party nomination process or general, primary, or special election; and such person shall be considered a candidate until a final report is filed pursuant to Article 3 (§

24.2-947

et seq.) of Chapter 9.3.

“Central absentee voter precinct”
means a precinct established pursuant to §

24.2-712

for the processing of absentee ballots for the county or city or any combination of precincts within the county or city.

“Constitutional office” or “constitutional officer”
means a county or city office or officer referred to in Article VII, § 4 of the Constitution of Virginia: clerk of the circuit court, attorney for the Commonwealth, sheriff, commissioner of the revenue, and treasurer.

“Department of Elections” or “Department”
means the state agency headed by the Commissioner of Elections.

“Direct recording electronic machine” or “DRE”
means the electronic voting machine on which a voter touches areas of a computer screen, or uses other control features, to mark a ballot and his vote is recorded electronically.

“Election”
means a general, primary, or special election.

“Election district”
means the territory designated by proper authority or by law which is represented by an official elected by the people, including the Commonwealth, a congressional district, a General Assembly district, or a district for the election of an official of a county, city, town, or other governmental unit.

“Electoral board” or “local electoral board”
means a board appointed pursuant to §

24.2-106

to administer elections for a county or city. The electoral board of the county in which a town or the greater part of a town is located shall administer the town’s elections.

“Entrance of polling place” or “entrance to polling place”
means an opening in the wall used for ingress to a structure.

“General election”
means an election held in the Commonwealth on the Tuesday after the first Monday in November or on the first Tuesday in May for the purpose of filling offices regularly scheduled by law to be filled at those times.

“General registrar”
means the person appointed by the electoral board of a county or city pursuant to §

24.2-110

to be responsible for all aspects of voter registration, in addition to other duties prescribed by this title. When performing duties related to the administration of elections, the general registrar is acting in his capacity as the director of elections for the locality in which he serves.

“Machine-readable ballot”
means a tangible ballot that is marked by a voter or by a system or device operated by a voter, is available for verification by the voter at the time the ballot is cast, and is then fed into and scanned by a separate counting machine capable of reading ballots and tabulating results.

“Officer of election”
means a person appointed by an electoral board pursuant to §

24.2-115

to serve at a polling place for any election.

“Paper ballot”
means a tangible ballot that is marked by a voter and then manually counted.

“Party” or “political party”
means an organization of citizens of the Commonwealth which, at either of the two preceding statewide general elections, received at least 10 percent of the total vote cast for any statewide office filled in that election. The organization shall have a state central committee and an office of elected state chairman which have been continually in existence for the six months preceding the filing of a nominee for any office.

“Person with a disability”
means a person with a disability as defined by the Virginians with Disabilities Act (§

51.5-1

et seq.).

“Polling place”
means the structure that contains the one place provided for each precinct at which the qualified voters who are residents of the precinct may vote.

“Precinct”
means the territory designated by the governing body of a county, city, or town to be served by one polling place.

“Primary” or “primary election”
means an election held for the purpose of selecting a candidate to be the nominee of a political party for election to office.

“Printed ballot”
means a tangible ballot that is printed on paper and includes both machine-readable ballots and paper ballots.

“Qualified voter”
means a person who is entitled to vote pursuant to the Constitution of Virginia and who is (i) 18 years of age on or before the day of the election or qualified pursuant to §

24.2-403

or subsection D of §

24.2-544

, (ii) a resident of the Commonwealth and of the precinct in which he offers to vote, and (iii) a registered voter. No person who has been convicted of a felony shall be a qualified voter unless his civil rights have been restored by the Governor or other appropriate authority. No person adjudicated incapacitated shall be a qualified voter unless his capacity has been reestablished as provided by law. Whether a signature should be counted towards satisfying the signature requirement of any petition shall be determined based on the signer of the petition’s qualification to vote. For purposes of determining if a signature on a petition shall be included in the count toward meeting the signature requirements of any petition, “qualified voter” shall include only persons maintained on the Virginia voter registration system (a) with active status and (b) with inactive status who are qualified to vote for the office for which the petition was circulated.

“Qualified voter in a town”
means a person who is a resident within the corporate boundaries of the town in which he offers to vote, duly registered in the county of his residence, and otherwise a qualified voter.

“Referendum”
means any election held pursuant to law to submit a question to the voters for approval or rejection.

“Registered voter”
means any person who is maintained on the Virginia voter registration system. All registered voters shall be maintained on the Virginia voter registration system with active status unless assigned to inactive status by a general registrar in accordance with Chapter 4 (§

24.2-400

et seq.). For purposes of applying the precinct size requirements of §

24.2-307

, calculating election machine requirements pursuant to Article 3 (§

24.2-625

et seq.) of Chapter 6, mailing notices of local election district, precinct or polling place changes as required by subdivision 13 of §

24.2-114

and §

24.2-306

, and determining the number of signatures required for candidate and voter petitions, “registered voter” shall include only persons maintained on the Virginia voter registration system with active status. For purposes of determining if a signature on a petition shall be included in the count toward meeting the signature requirements of any petition, “registered voter” shall include only persons maintained on the Virginia voter registration system (i) with active status and (ii) on inactive status who are qualified to vote for the office for which the petition was circulated.

“Registration records”
means all official records concerning the registration of qualified voters and shall include all records, lists, applications, and files, whether maintained in books, on cards, on automated data bases, or by any other legally permitted record-keeping method.

“Residence” or “resident,”
for all purposes of qualification to register and vote, means and requires both domicile and a place of abode. To establish domicile, a person must live in a particular locality with the intention to remain. A place of abode is the physical place where a person dwells.

“Special election”
means any election that is held pursuant to law to fill a vacancy in office or to hold a referendum.

“State Board” or “Board”
means the State Board of Elections.

“Virginia voter registration system” or “voter registration system”
means the automated central record-keeping system for all voters registered within the Commonwealth that is maintained as provided in Article 2 (§

24.2-404

et seq.) of Chapter 4.

“Voting system”
means the electronic voting and counting machines used at elections, including direct recording electronic machines (DRE), ballot scanner machines, and on-demand ballot printing systems and ballot marking devices used to manufacture or mark ballots to be cast by voters on electronic voting and counting machines.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-17, 24-18, 24-18.2, 24-22, 24-23, 24-44, 24-136, 24-137, 24-172, 24-346; 1956, c. 378; 1963, Ex. Sess., c. 2; 1964, c. 592; 1970, c. 462, §§

24.1-1

, 24.1-41, 24.1-42, 24.1-93; 1971, Ex. Sess., cc. 119, 205, 265; 1972, c. 620; 1973, c. 30; 1974, c. 428; 1975, c. 515; 1977, cc. 30, 490; 1978, c. 778; 1982, c. 650; 1983, c. 461; 1989, c. 322; 1991, 1st Sp. Sess., c. 12; 1993, c. 641; 1996, cc. 72, 73; 1997, c. 801; 1998, c. 866; 2001, c. 719; 2002, c. 487; 2003, c. 1015; 2005, c. 384; 2006, cc. 205, 787, 892; 2007, c. 311; 2008, c. 880; 2009, cc. 865, 870, 874; 2010, c. 707; 2013, cc. 542, 684; 2014, cc. 540, 576; 2015, c. 740; 2016, cc. 18, 492; 2020, c. 294; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 471; 2022, cc. 125, 126.

Cross references.

As to the prohibition against the chairmen or any full-time paid employees of a state political party working as lobbyists, see §

2.2-435

.

For constitutional provision as to free elections, see Va. Const., Art. I, § 6.

As to prohibition of religious tests, see Va. Const., Art. I, § 16.

For constitutional provisions as to persons excluded from registering and voting, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 1.

As to eligibility to vote as a qualification to hold elective office, see Va. Const., Art. II, § 5.

As to eligibility to vote as qualification of senators and delegates, see Va. Const., Art. IV, § 4.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 719 inserted “mailing notices of local election district, precinct or polling place changes as required by subdivision 11 of §

24.2-114

and §

24.2-306

” in the paragraph defining “Registered voter.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 487, in the definition of “Candidate,” deleted “and” following “(§

24.2-800

et seq.)” and inserted “and 9.2 (§

24.2-941

et seq.).”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 1015, substituted “10” for “ten,” “15” for “fifteen,” and “18” for “eighteen” throughout the section; substituted “subdivision 13” for “subdivision 11” in the definition of ‘Registered voter;’ substituted “election that” for “election which” in the definition of ‘Special election;’ and substituted “Commonwealth that” for “Commonwealth which” in the definition of ‘Virginia voter registration system.’

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 384, in the definition of “Candidate,” deleted “of this title” two times in the third sentence, and added the last sentence; deleted “of this title” two times in the definition of “Registered voter”; and deleted “of this title” in the definition of “Virginia voter registration system.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 205 inserted “on or before the day of the election or qualified pursuant to §

24.2-403

or subsection D of §

24.2-544

” in the definition of “Qualified voter.”

The 2006 amendments by cc. 787 and 892 are identical, and in the paragraph defining “Candidate,” substituted “9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.), and 9.5 (§

24.2-955

et seq.)” for “9 (§

24.2-900

et seq.) and 9.2 (§

24.2-947

et seq.)” in the third and fifth sentences, and substituted “Article 3 (§

24.2-947

et seq.) of Chapter 9.3” for “Article 4 (§ 24.2-914 et seq.) of Chapter 9” in the fifth sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 311 inserted “applications” following “lists” in the definition for “Registration records.”

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 880 added the definition for “Person with a disability.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 865, 870 and 874 are identical, and in the paragraph defining “residence” or “resident,” deleted the former last sentence, which read: “In determining domicile, consideration may be given to a person’s expressed intent, conduct, and all attendant circumstances including, but not limited to, financial independence, business pursuits, employment, income sources, residence for income tax purposes, marital status, residence of parents, spouse and children, if any, leasehold, sites of personal and real property owned by the person, motor vehicle and other personal property registration, and other factors reasonably necessary to determine the qualification of a person to register or vote” and added the present last two sentences.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 707 inserted the definition of “entrance of polling place”; and inserted “structure that contains the” in the definition of “polling place.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 542, effective July 1, 2014, added the paragraph defining “Department of Elections.”

The 2013 amendment by c. 684, in the definition of “qualified voter” substituted “a registered voter” for “registered to vote” in clause (iii) of the first sentence, and added the fourth and fifth sentences; and added the last two sentences in the definition of “registered voter.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by c. 540, effective April 3, 2014, and c. 576, effective April 4, 2014, are identical, and added the definitions of “Ballot scanner machine,” “Direct recording electronic machine,” “Machine-readable ballot,” “Paper ballot,” “Printed ballot,” and “Voting system.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 740 added “or ‘Department”’ preceding “means” in the definition for “Department of Elections.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 18 and 492 are identical, and added the definition for “General registrar.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 294 substituted “voter, is available for verification by the voter at the time the ballot is cast, and is then fed into and scanned by a separate” for “voter and then fed into and scanned by a” in the definition of “Machine-readable ballot.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 471, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “by a county or city” following “established” in the definition for “Central absentee voter precinct.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 125 and 126 are identical, and rewrote the definition of “Voting system,” which read: “ ‘Voting system’ means the electronic voting and counting machines used at elections. This term includes direct recording electronic machines (DRE) and ballot scanner machines.”

Law Review.

For 1995 survey of campaign and election law, see 29 U. Rich. L. Rev. 859 (1995).

For 2006 survey article, “Election Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 121 (2006).

For annual survey article, “Election Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 403 (2009).

For note, “The Last Frontier of Disenfranchisement: A Fundamental Right For Individuals With Cognitive Disabilities,” see 59 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 693 (2017).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

6B M.J. Elections, § 34; 14A M.J. Pardon, Probation and Parole, § 8.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Definition of “Candidate.” —

Candidate elected to city council as a representative of the beach district was not eligible to run for the seat where, considering the testimony, credibility of the witnesses, exhibits, and applicable law, the candidate did not have the intent to establish residency at an apartment in the district, but only intended to acquire an address in order to run for city council as a representative of the district. As a result, in accordance with §

24.2-812

, there had been no valid election of any person, the election of the candidate was void, and the vacancy was to be filled in conformity with §§

24.2-226

and

24.2-227

. Uhrin v. Nygaard, 101 Va. Cir. 252, 2019 Va. Cir. LEXIS 54 (Virginia Beach Mar. 5, 2019).

Voter and candidate’s new residence was candidate’s domicile. —

Candidate was properly registered to vote in a new district where the candidate’s new residence was located and was properly placed on the ballot for that district because the candidate showed that the candidate’s domicile was changed to the new address, even if the candidate’s spouse continued to reside at the old address, in that the candidate left the old residence intending to abandon that home as the candidate’s domicile, the candidate had not spent a night at the old residence after moving, the neighbors at the old residence had not seen the candidate after the move except on one occasion at a block party, and the records of the Virginia Department of Motor Vehicles reflected a change in the candidate’s address. In addition the candidate’s new residence was furnished with care, the candidate’s personal memorabilia were kept in the new residence, the candidate’s annual family celebrations were held at the new residence, and the candidate maintained an office at the new residence. Dixon v. Va. State Bd. of Elections, 83 Va. Cir. 371, 2011 Va. Cir. LEXIS 218 (Loudoun County Sept. 16, 2011).

§ 24.2-101.01.
Certified mail; subsequent mail or notices may be sent by regular mail.

Whenever in this title the State Board is required to send any mail or notice by certified mail and such mail or notice is sent certified mail, return receipt requested, then any subsequent, identical mail or notice that is sent by the State Board may be sent by regular mail.

History.

2011, c. 566.

§ 24.2-101.1.
Implementation of certain laws; special elections.

All laws enacted at a regular session of the General Assembly shall take effect as provided in §

1-214

except that the implementation of any change to this title shall not become effective for a special election held at a time other than a general election if the writ for the special election was issued prior to the effective date of the law.

History.

2008, c. 366.